Washington statutes.
RCW 18.205.170

Co-occurring disorder specialist enhancement—Review, analysis, and report.

(1) The department, in collaboration with the behavioral health institute at the University of Washington, the research and data analysis division at the department of social and health services, and the division of behavioral health and recovery at the health care authority, must conduct a review and analysis regarding the effects of the co-occurring disorder specialist enhancement created by chapter 444, Laws of 2019 on increasing the number of providers qualified to provide substance use disorder services and improving outcomes for persons with a substance use disorder.

(2) The review and analysis shall assess:

(a) The effects of the availability of the co-occurring disorder specialist enhancement on:

(i) Increasing the number of providers qualified to provide substance use disorder services; and

(ii) Improving outcomes for persons with a substance use disorder;

(b) The number of co-occurring disorder specialist enhancements that have been issued;

(c) The settings in which co-occurring disorder specialists are working;

(d) The geographic distribution of co-occurring disorder specialists;

(e) Any change in the number of certified substance use disorder professionals and substance use disorder professional trainees;

(f) Any change in the number of people receiving treatment at the appropriate level of care, including:

(i) The number of American society of addiction medicine assessments made by co-occurring disorder specialists;

(ii) The assessed level of care for clients according to American society of addiction medicine criteria;

(iii) Co-occurring mental health diagnoses for clients receiving services from a co-occurring disorder specialist;

(iv) The number of referrals made by co-occurring disorder specialists, by American society of addiction medicine level; and

(v) The number of successful placements made by co-occurring disorder specialists; and

(g) Any other factors relevant to assessing the effects of the availability of the co-occurring disorder specialist enhancement on the behavioral health workforce and the provision of appropriate services to clients.

(3) The agencies listed in subsection (1) of this section must develop the tools necessary to conduct the review and analysis required by this section.

(4) By December 1, 2022, the department shall submit a preliminary report of the findings of its review and analysis and any recommendations for improving the qualifications for an enhancement or the practice of those who have been issued an enhancement, and a final report by December 1, 2024.

[ 2019 c 444 s 30.]